Alaska, session 34, HB112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 06 * Section 1. The amount necessary, after the appropriations for state aid for public schools 07 that take effect in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and that are made in an Act passed by 08 the Thirty-Fourth Alaska State Legislature in the First Regular Session and enacted into law, 09 to fund the total amount for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, of state aid calculated under 10 the public school funding formula under AS 14.17.410(b) using a base student allocation 11 (AS 14.17.470) amount of $6,640 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 12 Education and Early Development to be distributed as grants to school districts according to 13 the average daily membership for each district adjusted under AS 14.17.410(b)(1)(A) - (D) for 14 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 01 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect July 1, 2025. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.